Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 7. Memorial Education Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 14.43.250.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature may pay tribute to the memory of Alaskans who, by the example of their lives, or by their distinguished contribution and service to this state, their community or their profession, exemplified the best that is the challenge of “The Great Land” by the creation of memorial education loans as a part of a general memorial education revolving loan fund, setting out the purpose for which each is created, and the conditions applicable to each loan.

The purposes of the several memorial education loan accounts in the memorial education revolving loan fund are as follows:

the Michael Murphy memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of Michael Murphy, a member of the Alaska State Troopers, who, while on leave from that division, gave his life for his adopted country in Vietnam on May 22, 1968;

the Carroll L. “Butch” Swartz memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of Carroll L. “Butch” Swartz, of Juneau, who was a student intern with the Criminal Justice Planning Agency and the Governor’s Commission on the Administration of Justice during the summer months of 1972 and 1973 and whose accidental and untimely death in November 1973 occurred while completing his undergraduate education at Yale University, thus never realizing his educational goals or career objective;

the Harvey Golub memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of Harvey Golub, of Juneau, who was chief engineer of the bridge design section of the Department of Highways of the State of Alaska and whose accidental and untimely death September 13, 1971, cut short a widely-respected career in civil engineering;

the Robert L. Thomas memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of Robert L. Thomas, of Juneau, who as Deputy Commissioner of Education, and for 13 years as a member of the professional staff of that department contributed significantly to the creation, operation, and administration of a sound system of public education in Alaska and whose tragic and untimely death March 12, 1974, terminated a distinguished career in education and public administration that long will be exemplary for those who aspire to service in that profession;

the A.W. (Winn) Brindle memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of A.W. (Winn) Brindle, who was the president of the Wards Cove Packing Company and Columbia-Wards Fisheries and whose death July 4, 1977, terminated a distinguished career dedicated to the development of the Alaska seafood industry; and

the Nick Begich memorial education loan perpetuates the memory of Nick Begich, teacher and school superintendent at Fort Richardson, father of the Alaska kindergarten program, state senator, and member of the United States House of Representatives, whose accidental and untimely death in October of 1972 cut short a productive and distinguished career in education and public service.

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.810

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, throughout this section “education” was substituted for “scholarship” and “education loan account” was substituted for “scholarship account”.

Sec. 14.43.255.
Fund created.

There is created a memorial education revolving loan fund. The fund shall be used to provide education loans to students selected under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

. Repayments of a loan shall be deposited into the memorial education revolving loan fund and shall be used to make new loans.

Each memorial education loan, the purpose of which is set out in AS

14.43.250(b)

, is a separate account in the memorial education revolving loan fund created under (a) of this section.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1986; am §§ 11, 12 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 18 ch 43 SLA 1991; am §§ 30, 42 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.815

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, in subsection (b), “education loan” was substituted for “scholarship” and “education revolving loan fund” was substituted for “scholarship revolving loan fund”.

Sec. 14.43.300.
Limits and conditions of loans.

An education loan to a recipient under AS

14.43.250(b)(1)

— (4) or (6) may not exceed $2,500 a school year for an undergraduate student or $5,000 a school year for a graduate student and may not be made to a student for more than six years. An education loan to a recipient under AS

14.43.250(b)(5)

may not exceed the cost of tuition and required fees, books and educational supplies, room and board, and transportation for two round trips between the recipient’s home and school each year. A loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(5)

may not be made for more than five years of undergraduate study, five years of graduate study, or a combined maximum of eight years of study.

A loan made under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

may be used only as follows:

a Michael Murphy memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a certificate or degree program in an accredited college or university in law enforcement, law, probation and parole, or penology, or closely related fields;

a Carroll L. “Butch” Swartz memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a degree program in an accredited college or university in criminal law, criminology, corrections, police science and administration, juvenile justice, or other fields closely related to criminal justice;

a Harvey Golub memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a degree program in an accredited college or university in civil, mechanical, electrical, electronic, petroleum, mining, traffic and transportation, sanitary, chemical, or other recognized field of engineering;

a Robert L. Thomas memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a degree program in an accredited college or university that will lead to a career in education or public administration, or other closely related field;

an A.W. (Winn) Brindle memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a certificate or degree program in an accredited school, college, or university in fisheries, fishery science, fishery management, seafood processing, food technology, or other closely related field; and

a Nick Begich memorial education loan may be used only to pursue a degree program in an accredited college or university that will lead to a career in education, public administration, government, or other closely related field.

The recipient of a memorial education loan must be a resident of Alaska and enrolled or eligible for enrollment as a full-time student in a certificate or degree program in a field listed in (b) of this section that is appropriate to the memorial education loan received.

The recipient must at all times continue to be enrolled as a full-time student in good standing at an accredited postsecondary institution that is appropriate to the memorial education loan received.

In any year in which the memorial education revolving loan fund created under AS

14.43.255

has inadequate receipts to fund a loan in one of the loan categories listed in AS

14.43.250(b)

, no loan in that loan category may be offered and the receipts shall be added to the amount available for that category in the succeeding year.

The administering authority may provide conditions in the note signed by the recipient or in a separate document or communication that will help it carry out the provisions of AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 63 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 78 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 168 SLA 1990; am §§ 2, 3 ch 13 SLA 1991; am §§ 39, 40 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1995; am § 18 ch 5 SLA 1996; am §§ 17, 31 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.820

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (a)-(c), (e), and (g); “memorial education loan” was substituted for “memorial scholarship” in subsection (d); and “education loan accounts” was substituted for “scholarship accounts” in subsection (g).

Administrative Code. —

For A.W. “Winn” Brindle memorial scholarship loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 8.

Sec. 14.43.305.
Repayment of loans.

Memorial education loans under AS

14.43.250(b)(1)

— (4) or (6) shall be noninterest-bearing and security for the loan may not be required. However, the note signed by the recipient shall provide for the payment of attorney fees, costs of court, and skip-tracing fees if any are incurred in collection of the unpaid amount owed on the loan.

No part of a loan made under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

need be repaid during an academic year in which the student is attending an accredited college or university as a full-time student.

Loans may be repaid at an accelerated rate at the option of the recipient.

If a loan is in default, the administering authority shall notify the recipient that repayment of the remaining balance is accelerated and due by sending the recipient a notice of registered or certified mail.

A recipient of a memorial education loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(1)

— (4) or (6) who graduates from a degree program, or for a loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(1)

from a certificate program, shall receive forgiveness of one-fifth of loan principal for each one-year period the recipient is employed full time in Alaska in

law-enforcement or related fields, if a recipient of a Michael Murphy memorial education loan;

criminal law, criminal justice, or other closely related fields, if a recipient of a Carroll L. “Butch” Swartz memorial education loan;

a recognized branch of the engineering profession or other closely related fields, if a recipient of a Harvey Golub memorial education loan;

education or public administration, or other closely related field, if a recipient of a Robert L. Thomas memorial education loan; or

education, public administration, government, or other closely related field, if a recipient of a Nick Begich memorial education loan.

That portion of the loan that is forgiven under (e) or (j) of this section shall be considered a grant to the recipient.

A recipient who does not qualify for forgiveness of all or a part of the loan made under AS

14.43.250(b)(1)

— (4) or (6) shall begin repayment of the unforgiven portion within six months after leaving employment or terminating studies in

law enforcement or related fields, if a recipient of a Michael Murphy memorial education loan;

criminal law, criminal justice, or other closely related fields, if a recipient of a Carroll L. “Butch” Swartz memorial education loan;

a recognized branch of the engineering profession or other closely related fields, if a recipient of a Harvey Golub memorial education loan;

education or public administration, or other closely related field, if a recipient of a Robert L. Thomas memorial education loan; or

education, public administration, government, or other closely related field, if a recipient of a Nick Begich memorial education loan.

The unforgiven portion of a loan under (g) of this section shall be repaid in an amount, and at a monthly rate, to be determined by the administering authority after consultation with the recipient, but in any event not less than $50 a month.

To the extent they are not in conflict with terms and conditions under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

, the terms and conditions of a memorial education loan made under AS

14.43.250(b)(5)

are the same as the terms and conditions for an education loan under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.160

, except that the interest on the loan is equal to five percent.

A recipient of a memorial education loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(5)

who graduates from a certificate or degree program shall receive forgiveness of 10 percent of loan principal, up to a maximum of 50 percent of loan principal, for each one-year period during the first five years following graduation that the recipient is employed full time in the state in fisheries, fishery science, fishery management, seafood processing, food technology, or other closely related field.

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 78 SLA 1986; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 13 SLA 1991; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 20 SLA 1995; am § 31 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.825

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (a), (e), (g), and (j).

Administrative Code. —

For A.W. “Winn” Brindle memorial scholarship loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 20, SLA 1995 provides that the amendments made to subsections (e), (f) and (i), and the addition of subsection (j), by ch. 20, SLA 1995 apply “to principal due on a loan entered into on or after July 1, 1995.”

Sec. 14.43.310.
Selection.

In selecting from among eligible applicants a person who will be granted a loan under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

, the administering authority shall consider the following:

the applicant’s career goals and aspirations;

the applicant’s prior academic record;

the financial need of the applicant; and

other items that may be considered relevant by the administering authority to determine whether an applicant will receive a loan.

To assist the administering authority in selecting eligible applicants for award of each of the memorial education loans under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

and in reviewing the memorial education loan program, the following advisory committees are established:

three Alaska state troopers, each one to be selected from and to represent a state trooper region of the state by the regional commander to serve for three years, for the Michael Murphy memorial education loan;

[Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

three members of the state Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors selected annually by the board from among its engineer members, for the Harvey Golub memorial education loan; and

three members of the state Board of Education and Early Development, or of the staff of the Department of Education and Early Development, or any combination of these, selected annually by the board, for the Robert L. Thomas memorial education loan.

In selecting from among eligible applicants for award of a memorial education loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(5)

, the administering authority shall give preference to applicants nominated by private donors to the A.W. (Winn) Brindle memorial education loan account in the memorial education revolving loan fund.

In selecting from among eligible applicants for award of a memorial education loan under AS

14.43.250(b)(6)

, the administering authority shall give preference to applicants nominated by the board members of the Nick Begich Scholarship Intern Fund, Inc.

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 10 ch 78 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 13 SLA 1991; am § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.830

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in paragraph (b)(4) in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch, 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (b)-(d).

Administrative Code. —

For A.W. “Winn” Brindle memorial scholarship loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 8.

Sec. 14.43.315.
Discrimination prohibited. [Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 14.43.320.
Administering authority.

The memorial education loans provided for under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

shall be administered by the executive director of the commission, subject to review by the commission and to those regulations the commission may prescribe to carry out the purposes of AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

.

To the extent that they are not in conflict with the provisions of AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

, the provisions of AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.160

relating to education loans are applicable to loans made under AS

14.43.250

—

14.43.325

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 19 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 32 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.840

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsection (a).

Administrative Code. —

For A.W. “Winn” Brindle memorial scholarship loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 8.

Sec. 14.43.325.
Funding.

The memorial education revolving loan fund created under AS

14.43.255

shall be funded by voluntary contributions by state employees who may contribute the value of one or more days of annual leave a year to the memorial education revolving loan fund to be credited to any one or more of the education loan accounts listed in AS

14.43.250(b)

at the discretion of the donor.

The Department of Administration shall pay to the account of the memorial education revolving loan fund established under AS

14.43.255

an amount equal to the value of the total number of days of annual leave contributed by state employees under (a) of this section.

The administering authority may accept contributions from private sources for the memorial education revolving loan fund created under AS

14.43.255

. These contributions shall be deposited in the memorial education revolving loan fund created under AS

14.43.255

to be credited to any one or more of the education loan accounts listed in AS

14.43.250(b)

at the discretion of the donor. For the purpose of this subsection, “private sources” means private individuals, corporations, foundations, or other philanthropic or charitable organizations.

History.

(§ 21 ch 136 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.845

. Renumbered in 1982.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45, ch. 85, SLA 2001, “education” was substituted for “scholarship” in subsections (a)-(c) and “education loan accounts” was substituted for “scholarship accounts” in subsection (c).